en: green bean, green beans, French bean
ar: الفاصوليا الخضراء
az: göy lobya
bg: зелен фасул
ca: mongeta tendra
cs: zelená fazolka
da: grønne bønne, grønne bønner, grønner bønner, havebønne, prydbønne
de: grüne Bohne, grüne Bohnen, Brechbohne, Schnittbohne, Fisole
dv: ފެހި ތޮޅި
el: χλωρά φασόλια, πράσινα φασόλια
es: judía verde, judías verdes, alubias verdes
eu: leka
fa: لوبیا سبز
fr: haricot vert, haricots verts, haricot princesse, haricots princesses
he: שעועית ירוקה
hr: grah mahunar, mahuna zelena
hu: zöldbab
it: fagiolino, fagiolo verde, fagiolini, fagioli verdi, Fagiolini verdi
ja: インゲンマメ, インゲン豆, いんげん豆, インゲン, いんげん, サヤインゲン
ko: 풋강낭콩
lv: zaļās pupiņas
mk: боранија
ms: pokok kacang buncis
nl: sperzieboon, sperziebonen, groene bonen, prinsessenboon, slaboon, prinsessenbonen
nn: brekkbønne
pl: fasolka szparagowa zielona, fasolka szparagowa, fasola szparagowa zielona, fasola szparagowa
pt: feijão-verde, vagem
ro: fasole pastai verde, fasole franțuzească, fasole verde păstăi
ru: фасоль стручковая, спаржевая фасоль, зелёностручковая фасоль
sa: निष्पावप्रभेदः
sq: mashurka
sr: боранија
sv: brytböna, brytbönor, gröna bönor, haricot vert, haricots verts
ta: பச்சை அவரை
tl: sitaw
uk: стручкова квасоля
zh: 豆角

fr: haricots verts coupés
es: judía verde cortada, Judías verdes cortadas
it: fagiolini tagliati
nl: gesneden sperziebonen
pl: fasolka szparagowa cięta
pt: Feijão verde cortado
ro: fasole verde pastai taiata

en: very fine green beans
de: grüne Bohnen sehr fein
fr: haricots verts très fins
hr: grah zeleni sitni
it: fagiolini verdi molto fini
nl: zeer fijne sperziebonen

en: extra-fine green beans
fr: haricots verts extra-fins
hr: ekstra fini zeleni grah
nl: extra fijne sperziebonen

en: pureed green bean
fr: purée de haricots verts
it: fagiolini verdi frullati

en: wax bean, yellow bean
de: Butterbohne
fr: haricot beurre, haricots beurre, haricots beurre très fins
gv: poanrey eeymey
hr: voštano zrno
it: fagiolo giallo
lv: vaska pupiņas
nl: boterboon
pl: fasolka szparagowa żółta, fasola szparagowa żółta

en: flat bean, romano bean, helda bean, flat green beans, flat beans, runner bean
de: flache Bohne, Helda Bohne, Romano Bohne, flache grüne Bohnen, flache Bohnen
es: judia verde plana, ferraúra
fi: romanopapu, romanopavut
fr: haricot vert plat, haricots verts plats, haricots plats
hr: pljosnati grah
nl: snijboon
nn: snittebønne
ro: fasole boabe Romano
sv: romanabönor

en: round green beans
de: runde grüne Bohnen, grüne Bohnen rund
es: judia verde redonda
hr: okrugli zeleni grah
it: fagiolini tondi

en: runner bean, runner beans
be: фасоля крывава-чырвоная, фасоля шматкветкавая, фасоля агніста-чырвона, турэцкія бабы
ca: mongetera vermella, fesolera vermella, fesol fava de sóller
cs: fazol šarlatový
cy: ffeuen ddringo
da: pralbønne
de: Feuerbohne, Wollbohne, Käferbohne
eo: fajrofazeolo, skarlata fazeolo
es: ayocote, ayecote, judía escarlata, poroto pallar
eu: bbbarrun loregorria
fa: لوبیای زینتی
fi: ruusupapu
fr: haricot d'espagne, haricot écarlate, haricot-fleur
ga: pónaire reatha
gl: faba de tres anos, feixón de tres anos, faba loba
hr: grah trkač
hy: կրակոտ կարմիր լոբի
it: fagiolo di spagna
ja: ベニバナインゲン
kk: түрік бұршағы
la: phaseolus coccineus
lt: raudonžiedė pupelė
nl: pronkboon
nn: prydbønne
pl: fasola wielokwiatowa
pt: jão-da-espanha, feijoca
ru: фасоль многоцветковая
sr: многоцветни пасуљ
sv: rosenböna
tr: ateş fasulyesi
zh: 荷包豆

en: mixed beans, bean mix
sv: blandade bönor

en: winged beans
la: Psophocarpus tetragonolobus

en: legume
af: Peulgewas
an: Legumbre
ar: بقول
bg: бобово растение
ca: llegum
cs: luštěnina
da: bælgfrugt
de: Hülsenfrucht
el: Όσπρια
eo: Guŝo
es: legumbre
et: kaunvili
eu: Lekale
fa: حبوبات
fi: palkokasvi
fr: légumineuse
ga: Glasra pischineálach
gl: Legume
gu: વાલ
ha: Legum
he: קטניות
hi: फली
hr: mahunarke
hu: hüvelyesek
hy: Հատիկաընդեղեն բույսեր
ia: Legumine
id: Kacang-kacangan
is: Baun
it: leguminose
ja: 豆果
ko: 협과
la: Legumen
lt: Ankštis
lv: pākšaugi
mn: Буурцаг
ms: Kekacang
nb: belgfrukt
ne: कोसेबाली
nl: peulvruchten, peulvrucht
nn: belgfrukt
pl: Rośliny strączkowe
pt: legume
qu: Chaqallu
ru: бобы
sa: राजशिम्बी
sd: دال
sh: Mahuna
sk: Strukoviny
sl: Strok
sr: махуна
sv: ärtväxt, ärtväxter
sw: Jamii kunde
ta: அவரை
th: ถั่ว
tr: baklagiller
tt: Бөртекле-кузаклы культуралар
uk: бобові культури
uz: dukkakli don ekinlari
vi: Quả đậu
zh: 荚果

en: pulse, pulses
fr: légumineuse sèche, légumineuses sèches, légumes secs, légume sec
hr: puls
it: legumi secchi
lv: žāvēti pākšaugi
nl: gedroogde peulvruchten
pt: pulso
sv: baljfrukt

en: hyacinth bean, lablab beans, dolichos beans, Egyptian beans
la: Lablab purpureus

en: lima bean, lima beans, butter bean
ca: garrofó, fesol de la peladilla, mongeta de Lima
da: limabønne, månebønne, sukkerbønne
de: Limabohne, Mondbohne
el: φασόλι της Lima, φασόλια Lima
eo: limofazeolo
es: Garrofones, Garrofón, Habones, Judías de Lima, Habas de Lima
eu: limako babarruna
fa: لوبیای عروس
fi: voipapu, limanpapu, valkoinen voipapu
fr: haricot de Lima, haricots de Lima
ga: pónaire mhór
hr: lima grah
ht: pwachouk
hu: Limabab, Lima bab
id: kacang kratok, kacang jawa, kekara
it: fagiolo di Lima
ja: ライマメ
ko: 리마콩
la: Phaseolus lunatus
ml: ബട്ടർ ബീൻസ്
ms: kacang serinding, kacang keratuk, kacang kratok, kacang cina
nb: limabønne, limabønner
nl: limaboon, Indische maanboon, wilgenbladboon, olifantsboon
pl: fasola półksiężycowata
pt: feijão de lima
ru: фасоль луновидная, Фасо́ль лунообра́зная, фасоль ли́мская, фасоль лу́нная
sr: лима пасуљ, lima pasulj
su: roay, kacang jawa, kekara
sv: limaböna, smörböna, smörbönor
sw: mfiwi
tl: patani
vi: dâu ngu
zh: 棉豆

en: dried lima bean
fr: haricot de Lima sec, haricots de Lima secs
it: fagioli di Lima secchi

en: large lima beans
fr: Grands haricots de Lima
it: fagioli di Lima grandi

en: baby lima beans
it: fagioli di Lima baby

en: pinto beans
cs: pinto fazole, fazole pinto
de: Pinto Bohnen, Pintobohnen
es: frijol pinto
fr: Haricots pinto
hr: grah crnobijeli
hu: pinto bab, pintos bab
it: fagioli pinto
sv: pintobönor, pintoböna

en: white beans, navy beans, great northern beans, haricot beans
bg: бял боб
cs: bílé fazole, fazole bílé
da: hvide bønner
de: weiße Bohnen
es: Alubias blancas, judia blanca
fi: valkoinen papu, valkoiset pavut
fr: haricots blancs, haricot blanc, cocos blancs, haricots coco blancs, haricots cocos blancs, haricots coco, haricots cocos, haricots blancs dits mogette, haricot plat coco
hr: grah bijeli
it: Fagioli bianchi
nb: hvite bønner
nl: witte bonen
pl: fasola biała
ru: фасоль белая
sv: vit böna, vita bönor